Hawaii, session 2026, GM1123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 462A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§462A- Duties of the director of transportation;
consultation. The director of transportation, or the director's
designee, shall provide information, data, reports, and other
consultative input to the department of commerce and consumer
affairs, as requested, for the establishment of port pilot
licensure standards, requirements, and criteria under this
chapter. The consultative input shall include, at a minimum,
examinations, the number of pilots necessary to maintain an
efficient pilotage service, pilot fees, and other rules to
ensure safe pilotage in the State's commercial ports.”
SECTION 2. Section 462A-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO

Page 2
S.B. NO.
-2
■ H.D.2
"§462A-3 Powers and duties of the director. In addition
to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the director
shall:
(1) Grant licenses to port pilots and deputy port pilots
pursuant to this chapter, when the need arises;
(2) [Adopt,] In consultation with the department of
transportation, adopt, amend, or repeal rules in
accordance with chapter 91 as may be necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter2_ which are to
provide for maximum efficiency in navigating vessels
entering or leaving the waters of [-this] the State;
maintain a pilotage system devoted to the
preservation[—] and protection of lives, property, and
vessels entering or leaving waters of the State; and
ensure an adequate supply of qualified pilots in aid
of commerce and navigation;
(3) [©eveiep] In consultation with the department of
transportation, develop appropriate standards for
licensure and renewal of licensure to maintain an
adequate supply of pilots based on the needs of users
of pilotage services [or the department of
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO 2
■IHlilHIilllilHillUn

Page 3
S.B.. 1-N^ . OI 'I. 2
tranaportatio-n ' □ harbora divi-ei-on ] . Licensing
requirements shall include examinations and
investigations to determine whether persons applying
for full port pilot [7-] or deputy port pilot licenses
are qualified;
(4) Enforce this chapter and rules adopted pursuant
thereto;
(5) [&»9peftd7-] In consultation with the department of
transportation, suspend/ revoke2_ or deny the issuance
of any license for any cause prescribed by this
chapter, or for any violation of [the] rules [-^]
adopted thereto;
(6) Investigate any person for violations of [any
previeiefta—et] this chapter[-^] and rules adopted
thereto;
(7) Adopt methods to improve disciplinary and enforcement
programs against violations of this chapter [-rl and
rules adopted thereto; and
(8) [©e] In consultation with the department of
transportation, do all things reasonable, necessary,
and expedient to [-insane] ensure proper and safe
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO 3

S.B. NO. ^2
H.D. 2
pilotage and to facilitate the efficient
administration of this chapter."
SECTION 3. Section 462A-3.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-(•] §462A-3.5 [^] Adequate supply of licenses. (a) The
director, in consultation with the department of transportation,
shall determine the number of pilots necessary to maintain an
efficient pilotage service in accordance with this chapter.
(b) [The] In making a recommendation to the director, t^
department of transportation, in consultation with users of
pilotage services [7—the—department of t-ga-noportation' 0-ha-rboro
divioion, ] and the professional association of port pilots in
the State^, shall give primary consideration to the public
interest in ensuring that there is an adequate supply of
qualified pilots to safely and economically meet the
requirements of commerce."
SECTION 4. Section 462A-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§462A-8 Denial, suspension, or revocation. In addition
to any other actions authorized by law, the director, in
consultation with the department of transportation, may deny the
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO 4
niiiiHiimniuni

Page 5
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
issuance of a license to any applicant, and may suspend or
revoke the license of any pilot for any cause authorized by law,
including but not limited to the following:
(1) Violation of this chapter or any rule adopted by the
director;
(2) Loss, damage, or injury due to negligent pilotage;
(3) Habitual use of any substance rendering a pilot unfit
to be entrusted with the charge of a vessel;
(4) Inability to physically or mentally perform the duties
of a pilot;
(5) Failure to maintain active service as a pilot in the
State;
(6) Procurement of a license through fraudulent
misrepresentation or deceit;
(7) Participation in any unfair or deceptive act or
practice as prohibited by section 480-2;
(8) Violation of any law or rule intended to promote
marine safety or protect navigational waters;
(9) Failure to report marine accidents in accordance with
the [-ftties] requirements of this chapter; or
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO 5

Page 6
S.B. NO. ^2
H.D. 2
(10) Failure to maintain a current and valid federal pilots
license issued in accordance with title 46 [7-] United
States Code [7-] chapter 71."
SECTION 5. Section 462A-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§462A-11 Rates of pilotage. [The] Notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, the director, in consultation with the
department of transportation, shall establish the rates of
pilotage for vessels subject to this chapter as follows:
(1) The rates of pilotage in effect on July 1, 1978, shall
remain in effect until changed by the director
pursuant to this chapter[—]£
(2) No rate shall be increased, lowered, or altered
without a public hearing in accordance with chapter
91 [-S-- B«e] and due notice of a hearing shall be mailed
at least thirty days before the date of the
hearing to the individual licensed pilots, the pilot's
association, and all owners, charterers, operators,
and agents of vessels who have registered with the
department [-r] £
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO 6

Page 7
S.B. NO.
H.D.2
(3) The director, in setting rates of pilotage, shall fix
[•s^ieh-] amounts as will be a fair charge for the
services rendered with due regard to necessary
operating expenses, maintenance of, depreciation on,
and return on investment for property used in the
business of pilotage, and the rates and charges of
pilotage at comparable ports of the United States[—]£
and
(4) Persons aggrieved by the director's decision setting
the rates of pilotage may appeal to circuit court as
provided in chapter 91."
SECTION 6. Section 462A-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§462A-17 Description of pilotage waters. Pilotage waters
as established under this chapter shall be the waters of the
State described as follows:
-- Port Alien!-- All waters inside a lino dr-awn from Puolu
Point to Well Point.
HL Nawiliwili: All waters inside a line drawn from
Ninini Point to Hawaii Point[—];
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO
ilLillilEHEIiOIlIliin

Page 8 3102
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
[4-3^] Honolulu: All waters inside a line drawn from
Diamond Head Light, 278® true, to the intersection of
a line drawn from the seaward edge of the reef runway
at Latitude 21®-18.2' North and Longitude 157°-55.6'
West, 180° true[-!-]2.
[-(-4-)-] (3) Kahului: All waters inside a line drawn from
Waiehu Point to Waihee Reef Lighted Buoy 2 in Latitude
20°55.9' North and Longitude 156°28.5' West and thence
to Papaula Point [-r]£
[-(5-)-] (4) Hilo: All waters inside a line drawn from the
outer extremity of the Hilo Bay breakwater to Paukaa
Point Light[—]£
[-(-6-)-] (5) Kawaihae: All waters inside a line drawn from
the outer extremity of the Kawaihae Harbor breakwater
due West to Longitude 155°51' West, thence due North
to Latitude 20°03' North and thence due East to where
it intersects with the shoreline [-r]
[4-7-)-] (6) Barbers Point: All waters inside a line drawn
from the northernmost refinery tower, 250° true, to
the intersection of a line drawn tangentially to Maile
Point, 165° true."
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO 8
■liliMIUIHIIM

Page 9
S.B. NO.
SECTION 7. Section 462A-18, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§462A-18 Vessels required to take a pilot. Every vessel,
other than an exempt vessel, entering or departing from any port
in or traversing the waters of the State designated as pilotage
waters shall employ a pilot licensed under this chapter;
provided that a vessel declared by the director of
transportation to be in immediate danger of destruction or
[whieh-] that poses an immediate hazard to public safety by its
presence in the harbor may be moved without a pilot when a pilot
is not immediately available."
SECTION 8. Section 462A-19, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§462A-19 Exen^Jt vessels. This chapter [dees-] shall not
apply to:
(1) Any vessel required by the laws of the United States
[of Amorioa] to be under the direction and control of
a federally licensed pilot;
(2) Public vessels of the United States [of Tkmcri-ca] ;
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO 9

Page 10 3102
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
(3) Fishing vessels that have been issued a fishery
license or appropriately endorsed registry under the
laws of the United States [of Amorica];
(4) Tugs or towboats of 1,600 gross tons or less [whiefe]
that are registered in the United States if the
master, mate, or operator is licensed in the United
States and has made a minimum of six round trips into
and out of the pilotage water [which] that the vessel
is traversing; or
(5) Vessels under 300 gross tons.
This section provides minimum pilotage requirements, and
[-io-not intended] shall not be construed to negate the
department of transportation's responsibility for the safety of
all ports and shore waters in the State, nor [doco] shall it be
construed to limit the [department'o] department of
transportation's right to require additional pilotage should
[that] the department of transportation determine it is
necessary to ensure safety in the ports or shore waters of the
State."
SECTION 9. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO
■iiiiniiniiiiiDiniiin

Page 11 3102
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
SECTION 10. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2948 SB3102 HD2 HMSO


S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 21st day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.NO. 3102, S.D. 2, H.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 22, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 3102, SD 2, HD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 8, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives